trunk/incubator/apertium-sh-sl.sl.dix
    <!-- NOUNS END-->
    <!-- VERBS START-->
    <pardef n="/biti__vbser">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>biti</l>
          <r>biti<s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sem</l>
          <r>biti<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>si</l>
          <r>biti<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>je</l>
          <r>biti<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sva</l>
          <r>biti<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sta</l>
          <r>biti<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sta</l>
          <r>biti<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>smo</l>
          <r>biti<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ste</l>
          <r>biti<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>so</l>
          <r>biti<s n="vbser"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bom</l>
          <r>biti<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>boš</l>
          <r>biti<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bo</l>
          <r>biti<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bova</l>
          <r>biti<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bosta</l>
          <r>biti<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bosta</l>
          <r>biti<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bomo</l>
          <r>biti<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>boste</l>
          <r>biti<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>bodo</l>
          <r>biti<s n="vbser"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sem bil</l>
          <r>biti<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sem<b/>bila</l>
          <r>biti<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sem<b/>bilo</l>
          <r>biti<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>si<b/>bil</l>
          <r>biti<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>si<b/>bila</l>
          <r>biti<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>si<b/>bilo</l>
          <r>biti<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>je<b/>bil</l>
          <r>biti<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>je<b/>bila</l>
          <r>biti<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>je<b/>bilo</l>
          <r>biti<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sva<b/>bila</l>
          <r>biti<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sva<b/>bili</l>
          <r>biti<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sva<b/>bila</l>
          <r>biti<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p1"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sta<b/>bila</l>
          <r>biti<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sta<b/>bili</l>
          <r>biti<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sta<b/>bila</l>
          <r>biti<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sta<b/>bila</l>
          <r>biti<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sta<b/>bili</l>
          <r>biti<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sta<b/>bila</l>
          <r>biti<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="du"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>smo<b/>bili</l>
          <r>biti<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>smo<b/>bile</l>
          <r>biti<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>smo<b/>bila</l>
          <r>biti<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ste<b/>bili</l>
          <r>biti<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ste<b/>bile</l>
          <r>biti<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ste<b/>bila</l>
          <r>biti<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>so<b/>bili</l>
          <r>biti<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>so<b/>bile</l>
          <r>biti<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>so<b/>bila</l>
          <r>biti<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="biti"><i/><par n="/biti__vbser"/></e>
